Illinois, session 104th, HB1235.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Sections 510-20.88 and 34-18.88 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/10-20.88 new)7    Sec. 10-20.88. Minimum percentage of minority teaching 8candidates.9    (a) During the process of interviewing candidates for a 10teaching position, a school district with a population of 113,000 or more students must interview a minimum percentage of 12minority candidates for the position as provided in this 13subsection (a). The minimum percentage requirement does not 14apply to teaching positions in an English as a Second Language 15program. The minimum percentage is calculated by subtracting 1610% from the percentage of minority students enrolled in the 17school district. A school district that is unable to interview 18the required minimum percentage of minority candidates for 2 19consecutive years must establish a program to assist minority 20employees of the school district who are interested in 21obtaining a Professional Educator License under Section 21B-20 22of this Code.23    (b) To facilitate the implementation of the program that   HB1235- 2 -LRB104 06033 LNS 16066 b1may be required under subsection (a), a school district is 2encouraged to collaborate with an Illinois institution of 3higher education that offers an approved educator preparation 4program. The program established by the school district under 5subsection (a) must:6        (1) provide minority employees with information about 7    the educator preparation program;8        (2) assist minority employees in enrolling in the 9    educator preparation program;10        (3) offer flexible work hours for an employee to 11    complete the educator preparation program; and12        (4) provide financial incentives to encourage minority 13    employees to obtain a Professional Educator License.14    (c) A program developed by a school district under 15subsection (a) must be submitted to and approved by the State 16Board of Education prior to implementation of the program. 17    (105 ILCS 5/34-18.88 new)18    Sec. 34-18.88. Minimum percentage of minority teaching 19candidates.20    (a) During the process of interviewing candidates for a 21teaching position, the school district must interview a 22minimum percentage of minority candidates for the position as 23provided in this subsection (a). The minimum percentage 24requirement does not apply to teaching positions in an English 25as a Second Language program. The minimum percentage is   HB1235- 3 -LRB104 06033 LNS 16066 b1calculated by subtracting 10% from the percentage of minority 2students enrolled in the school district. If the school 3district is unable to interview the required minimum 4percentage of minority candidates for 2 consecutive years, the 5school district must establish a program to assist minority 6employees of the school district who are interested in 7obtaining a Professional Educator License under Section 21B-20 8of this Code.9    (b) To facilitate the implementation of the program that 10may be required under subsection (a), the school district is 11encouraged to collaborate with an Illinois institution of 12higher education that offers an approved educator preparation 13program. The program established by the school district under 14subsection (a) must:15        (1) provide minority employees with information about 16    the educator preparation program;17        (2) assist minority employees in enrolling in the 18    educator preparation program;19        (3) offer flexible work hours for an employee to 20    complete the educator preparation program; and21        (4) provide financial incentives to encourage minority 22    employees to obtain a Professional Educator License.23    (c) A program developed by the school district under 24subsection (a) must be submitted to and approved by the State 25Board of Education prior to implementation of the program. 26    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon   HB1235- 4 -LRB104 06033 LNS 16066 b1becoming law.